Missouri, session 2026, SB1628.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 162.720, 167.268, 167.340, and
167.645, RSMo, are repealed and four new sections enacted in
lieu thereof, to be known as sections 162.720, 167.268, 167.340,
and 167.645, to read as follows:
162.720. 1. (1) This subdivision shall apply to all
school years ending before July 1, 2024. Where a sufficient
number of children are identified as gifted and their
development requires programs or services beyond the level
of those ordinarily provided in regular public school
programs, districts may establish special programs for such
gifted children.
(2) For school year 2024-25 and all subsequent school
years, if three percent or more of students enrolled in a
school district are identified as gifted and their
development requires programs or services beyond the level
of those ordinarily provided in regular public school
programs, the district shall establish a state-approved
gifted program for gifted children.
2. For school year 2024-25 and all subsequent school
years, any teacher providing gifted services to students in
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1628 2
districts with an average daily attendance of more than
three hundred fifty students shall be certificated in gifted
education. In districts with an average daily attendance of
three hundred fifty students or fewer, any teacher providing
gifted services shall not be required to be certificated to
teach gifted education but such teacher shall annually
participate in at least six clock hours of professional
development focused on gifted services. The school district
shall pay for such professional development focused on
gifted services.
3. The state board of education shall determine
standards for such gifted programs and gifted services.
Approval of gifted programs shall be made by the state
department of elementary and secondary education based upon
project applications submitted at a time and in a form
determined by the department of elementary and secondary
education.
4. (1) For the 2027-28 school year and all subsequent
school years, each school district shall provide universal
screenings for all students at least once before the
beginning of grade three for the purpose of screening for
gifted students. Such screenings shall:
(a) Provide a body of current, valid, and reliable
evidence from a minimum of two areas including, but not
limited to:
a. General mental ability testing;
b. Academic achievement;
c. Creativity;
d. Reasoning;
e. Problem solving;
f. Parent, teacher, student, or self-referrals; and
g. Other evidence of gifts and talents; and

SB 1628 3
(b) Be reviewed by a minimum of three staff members
trained in gifted education, administration, or assessment,
or a combination of such areas for a referral for formal
gifted assessment.
(2) No district shall identify a child as gifted based
solely on the child's participation in an advanced placement
course or international baccalaureate course.
(3) Districts shall identify a child as gifted only if
the child meets the definition of gifted children as
provided in section 162.675.
(4) A child's failure to meet criteria on a single
screening or assessment tool shall not prevent further data
collection or consideration for gifted identification of
such child.
5. [Any district with a gifted education program
approved under subsection 3 of this section] For the 2026-27
school year and all subsequent school years, each school
district shall have a policy, approved by the board of
education of the district, that establishes a process:
(1) For the universal screening of students for gifted
program selection;
(2) For providing annual notification to parents and
guardians of such screening process;
(3) For identifying students for the gifted program
and notifying parents and guardians of the criteria the
district uses for the identification of students for the
gifted program, provided that such criteria shall be guided
by recommendations from the advisory council on the
education of gifted and talented children established under
section 161.249 and the standards established by the state
board of education; and

SB 1628 4
(4) That outlines the procedures and conditions under
which parents or guardians may request a review of the
decision that their child did not qualify to receive
services through the district's gifted education program.
6. School districts and school district employees
shall be immune from liability for any and all acts or
omissions relating to the decision that a child did not
qualify to receive services through the district's gifted
education program.
7. The department of elementary and secondary
education may promulgate all necessary rules and regulations
for the implementation and administration of this section.
Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in
section 536.010, that is created under the authority
delegated in this section shall become effective only if it
complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of
chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This
section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the
powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter
536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove
100 and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional,
101 then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed
102 or adopted after August 28, 2022, shall be invalid and void.
167.268. 1. Each school district and charter school
shall have on file a policy for reading success plans. Each
school district and charter school shall provide all parents
and guardians of students, including parents of students who
are identified as having a reading deficiency or substantial
reading deficiency [in reading] under subsection [1] 4 of
section 167.645, with suggestions for regular parent-guided
home reading.

SB 1628 5
2. The department of elementary and secondary
education shall develop guidelines to assist districts and
charter schools in formulating policies for reading success
plans. Such guidelines may include, but are not limited to,
measures of reading proficiency, strategies for addressing
reading deficiencies, timelines for measuring pupil
improvement in reading, and information on screening of
dyslexia. Such guidelines may also identify performance
levels for pupils identified as handicapped or severely
handicapped and conditions under which such pupils may be
exempt from the provisions of this section and section
167.645.
3. Each school district and charter school shall
provide intensive reading instruction to students as
provided in section 167.645.
167.340. 1. The provisions of sections 167.340 to
167.346 shall be known and may be cited as the "Read to be
Ready Program".
2. Beginning July 1, [2000] 2027, if a school district
provides reading improvement instruction for students in
[kindergarten] first grade through third grade who do not
meet the [district's] state's objectives for reading as
demonstrated by performance on the [district's chosen
methods of reading assessment] Missouri universal reading
screener established in section 167.645, such students who
receive reading improvement instruction pursuant to this
subsection may be counted for additional average daily
attendance for state school aid during their reading
improvement instruction time if such time falls outside
normal school hours.
3. Reading improvement instruction may take the form
of summer school, provided that the summer school

SB 1628 6
instruction addresses the reading deficiency, additional
hours of instruction or such other methods as the district
may select including, but not limited to, smaller class
sizes, additional resources including computers, reading
specialists, teacher and administrator training, tutoring,
phonics instruction and use of parents and volunteers.
167.645. 1. (1) The "Missouri Universal Reading
Screener" is hereby established as a uniform, universal,
literacy-based reading assessment administered to students
in grade one through grade three in every school district
and charter school in the state. The screener shall score
each student in one of the following categories: "below
basic", "basic", "grade-level", "proficient", or
"advanced". Proficiency benchmarks associated with these
categories shall be determined by the department of
elementary and secondary education.
(2) Each school district and charter school shall
assess all students enrolled in [kindergarten] grade one
through grade three [at the beginning and end of each school
year] for their level of reading [or reading readiness on
state-approved reading assessments. Additionally, all
school districts and charter schools shall assess any newly
enrolled student in grades one through five for their level
of reading or reading readiness on a reading assessment from
the state-approved list] proficiency on the Missouri
universal reading screener. Each school district and
charter school shall administer the Missouri universal
reading screener during three annual administration windows
established by the department of elementary and secondary
education.
2. The department of elementary and secondary
education shall provide the Missouri universal reading

SB 1628 7
screener at no cost to school districts and charter
schools. The Missouri universal reading screener:
(1) Shall be appropriate for students in grade one
through grade three; and
(2) May be used to comply with the dyslexia screening
requirements established in section 167.950.
3. Student results on the universal reading screener
shall not be used to make decisions concerning the
accreditation classification of a public school or school
district.
4. At the beginning of the school year, each school
district and charter school shall provide a reading success
plan to any student who:
(1) Exhibits a reading deficiency or substantial
reading deficiency [in reading which creates a barrier to]
that impedes the child's progress learning to read. The
identification of such deficiency may be based upon the most
recent assessments [or teacher observation]; or
(2) Has been identified as being at risk of dyslexia
in [the] a statewide dyslexia screening or has a formal
diagnosis of dyslexia.
For the purposes of this section, a reading deficiency shall
refer to a student who scores "basic" on the Missouri
universal reading screener, and a substantial reading
deficiency shall refer to a student who [is one or more
grade level or levels behind in reading or reading
readiness] scores below "below basic" on the Missouri
universal reading screener; provided that nothing in this
section shall be interpreted to prevent a school district or
charter school from offering a reading success plan to any
student based on an assessment completed [at the start and

SB 1628 8
end of the school year] during the three administration
windows or based on teacher observation. For any student
entering the school district or charter school after the
start of the school year, such student shall be provided a
reading success plan in the event the student has been
identified as having a reading deficiency or substantial
reading deficiency based on the student's most recent
assessment [or otherwise being identified through teacher
observation. The student's reading proficiency shall be
reassessed by reading assessments on the state-approved
list]. The student shall continue to be provided with
intensive reading instruction under a reading success plan
until the reading deficiency is remedied.
[2.] 5. The district or charter school shall notify
the parent or guardian of any student in [kindergarten]
grade one through grade three who exhibits a reading
deficiency or substantial reading deficiency [in reading],
as described in subsection [1] 4 of this section, at least
annually in writing, and in an appropriate, alternative
manner for the parent or other guardian if necessary, of the
following:
(1) That the child has been identified as having a
reading deficiency or substantial reading deficiency [in
reading];
(2) A description of the services currently provided
to the child;
(3) A description of the proposed supplemental
instructional services and supports that the school district
will provide to the child that are designed to remediate the
identified area of reading deficiency. For students
identified as being at risk of dyslexia or those that have a
diagnosis of dyslexia the district shall provide an

SB 1628 9
explanation that the instruction that will be used to teach
the child reading shall be explicit, systematic, and
diagnostic and based on phonological awareness, phonics,
fluency, vocabulary, comprehension, morphology, syntax, and
semantics;
(4) Strategies for parents and guardians to use in
helping the child succeed in reading proficiency, including
but not limited to the promotion of parent-guided home
reading;
(5) That if the child has a substantial reading
100 deficiency that is not corrected by the end of grade three,
101 the child shall not be promoted to grade four unless the
102 child qualifies for a good cause exemption under subsections
103 8 and 9 of this section.
104 [3.] 6. If the school district or charter school
105 provides a summer reading program under this section, the
106 district or charter school shall notify the parent or
107 guardian of each student who exhibits a reading deficiency
108 or substantial reading deficiency [in reading] of the
109 opportunity to attend the summer reading program.
110 [4.] 7. (1) Beginning in the 2027-28 school year and
111 continuing in all subsequent school years, if a student has
112 a substantial reading deficiency at the end of third grade[,
113 the student's parent or guardian and appropriate school
114 staff shall discuss whether the student should be retained
115 in grade level, based on a consideration of all relevant
116 factors, including the reading deficiency, the student's
117 progress in other subject areas, and the student's overall
118 intellectual, physical, emotional, and social development.
119 A decision to promote or retain a student with a substantial
120 reading deficiency at the end of grade three shall be made
121 only after direct personal consultation with the student's

SB 1628 10
122 parent or guardian and after the formulation of a specific
123 plan of action to remedy the student's reading deficiency]
124 as determined by the department of elementary and secondary
125 education based upon such student's performance on the
126 Missouri universal reading screener, the student shall be
127 retained in grade three, unless:
128 (a) Such student scores "basic" or higher on a retest
129 opportunity under subdivision (2) of this subsection; or
130 (b) Such student qualifies for a good cause exemption
131 under subsections 8 and 9 of this section.
132 (2) A student retained under subdivision (1) of this
133 subsection may be promoted to grade four if the student
134 successfully completes a state-approved summer reading
135 program and scores "basic" or higher on a retest opportunity
136 through the Missouri universal reading screener.
137 8. A student may be promoted to grade four despite
138 scoring "below basic" on the Missouri universal reading
139 screener if the student has a good cause exemption. Good
140 cause exemptions shall be limited to the following:
141 (1) Students with disabilities who have an approved
142 individualized education plan developed under the federal
143 Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (IDEA), 20
144 U.S.C. Section 1401, et seq., as amended, that indicates
145 that participation in the statewide assessment program is
146 not appropriate, consistent with state and federal law;
147 (2) Students with disabilities who participate in the
148 statewide summative English language arts assessment and who
149 have either of the following plans reflecting that the
150 student has received intensive reading intervention for more
151 than two years but still demonstrates a substantial reading
152 deficiency:

SB 1628 11
153 (a) An approved individualized education plan
154 developed under the federal Individuals with Disabilities
155 Education Act (IDEA), 20 U.S.C. Section 1401, et seq., as
156 amended; or
157 (b) A 504 plan created under Section 504 of the
158 federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. Section 794,
159 as amended;
160 (3) Students identified as English language learners
161 who have had fewer than two years of instruction in an
162 English language learner program; and
163 (4) Students who have already been retained at least
164 once in any of grades kindergarten through grade three.
165 9. Requests for a good cause exemption shall be made
166 in accordance with the following requirements:
167 (1) Documentation shall be submitted from the
168 student's teacher to the school principal indicating that
169 the promotion of the student is appropriate. Such
170 documentation shall consist only of the good cause exemption
171 being requested and the existing reading improvement plan or
172 individualized education plan, as applicable;
173 (2) The school principal shall review and discuss the
174 recommendation with the teacher and make the determination
175 as to whether the student qualifies for one of the good
176 cause exemptions described in subsection 8 in this section.
177 If the school principal determines that the student is
178 eligible for one of the good cause exemptions based on the
179 documentation provided, the school principal shall make such
180 recommendation in writing to the superintendent of the
181 school district. The superintendent shall accept or reject
182 the school principal's recommendation in writing.

SB 1628 12
183 10. (1) The school district shall assist schools with
184 providing written notification to the parent of any student
185 who is retained that:
186 (a) Such student has not met the reading level
187 required for promotion;
188 (b) The reasons the student is not eligible for a good
189 cause exemption; and
190 (c) That such student will be retained in grade three.
191 (2) The notification required under subdivision (1) of
192 this subsection shall include a description of the proposed
193 interventions and supports that will be provided to the
194 child to remedy the identified area or areas of reading
195 deficiency in the following school year.
196 [5.] 11. Each school district or charter school shall
197 do all of the following:
198 (1) Provide students who are identified as having a
199 reading deficiency or substantial reading deficiency [in
200 reading] under subsection [1] 4 of this section, have been
201 identified as being at risk of dyslexia in the statewide
202 dyslexia screening, or have a formal diagnosis of dyslexia
203 with intensive instructional services and supports specified
204 in a reading success plan, as appropriate according to
205 student need, free of charge, to remediate the identified
206 areas of reading deficiency, including additional
207 scientific, evidence-based reading instruction and other
208 strategies prescribed by the school district or charter
209 school which may include but are not limited to the
210 following:
211 (a) Small group or individual instruction;
212 (b) Reduced teacher-student ratios;
213 (c) More frequent progress monitoring;
214 (d) Tutoring or mentoring;

SB 1628 13
215 (e) Extended school day, week, or year; and
216 (f) Summer reading programs;
217 (2) For any student with a formal diagnosis of
218 dyslexia or for a student who was found to be at risk of
219 dyslexia in the statewide dyslexia screening, the school
220 district or charter school shall provide evidence-based
221 reading instruction that addresses phonology, sound-symbol
222 association, syllable instruction, morphology, syntax, and
223 semantics provided through systematic, cumulative, explicit,
224 and diagnostic methods;
225 (3) At regular intervals, but no less than four times
226 per year in a manner that reflects progress through each
227 school term, notify the parent or guardian of academic and
228 other progress being made by the student and give the parent
229 or guardian other useful information;
230 (4) In addition to required reading enhancement and
231 acceleration strategies, provide all parents of students,
232 including parents of students who are identified as having a
233 reading deficiency or substantial reading deficiency [in
234 reading] under subsection [1] 4 of this section, with a plan
235 that includes suggestions for regular parent-guided home
236 reading.
237 [6.] 12. Each school district and charter school shall
238 ensure that intensive reading instruction through a reading
239 development initiative shall be provided to each
240 [kindergarten] grade one through grade [five] three student
241 who is assessed as exhibiting a reading deficiency or
242 substantial reading deficiency [in reading]. In addition to
243 the requirements otherwise provided, such instruction shall
244 also comply with all of the following criteria:
245 (1) Be provided to all [kindergarten] grade one
246 through grade [five] three students who exhibit a reading

SB 1628 14
247 deficiency or substantial reading deficiency [in reading]
248 under this section. The assessments shall measure phonemic
249 awareness, phonics, fluency, vocabulary, and comprehension;
250 (2) Be provided during regular school hours;
251 (3) Provide a reading curriculum that meets the
252 requirements of section 170.014, and at a minimum has the
253 following specifications:
254 (a) Assists students assessed as exhibiting a reading
255 deficiency or substantial reading deficiency [in reading] to
256 develop the skills to read at grade level;
257 (b) Provides skill development in phonemic awareness,
258 phonics, fluency, vocabulary, and comprehension;
259 (c) Includes a scientifically based and reliable
260 assessment;
261 (d) Does not include the three-cueing system, as
262 defined in section 170.014, to teach word reading;
263 (e) Provides initial and ongoing analysis of each
264 student's reading progress; and
265 [(e)] (f) Provides a curriculum in core academic
266 subjects to assist the student in maintaining or meeting
267 proficiency levels for the appropriate grade in all academic
268 subjects.
269 [7.] 13. School districts and charter schools shall
270 report to the department the specific intensive reading
271 interventions and supports implemented by the school
272 district or charter school pursuant to this section as well
273 as the reading assessment data collected for grades
274 [kindergarten] one through [five] three. The department
275 shall annually prescribe the components of required or
276 requested reports.
277 [8.] 14. (1) Each school district and charter school
278 shall address reading proficiency as part of its

SB 1628 15
279 comprehensive school improvement plan, drawing upon
280 information about children from assessments conducted
281 pursuant to subsection 1 of this section and the prevalence
282 of deficiencies identified by classroom, elementary school,
283 and other student characteristics. As part of its
284 comprehensive school improvement plan or contract, each
285 school district or charter school shall review chronic early
286 elementary absenteeism for its impact on literacy
287 development. If more than fifteen percent of an attendance
288 center's students are not at grade level in reading by the
289 end of third grade, the comprehensive school improvement
290 plan or contract shall include strategies to reduce that
291 percentage, including school and community strategies to
292 raise the percentage of students who are proficient in
293 reading.
294 (2) Each school district and charter school shall
295 provide professional development services to enhance the
296 skills of elementary teachers in responding to children's
297 unique reading issues and needs and to increase the use of
298 evidence-based strategies.
299 15. Each district school board shall, by October first
300 of each year, report in writing to the department of
301 elementary and secondary education the following information
302 regarding the immediately preceding school year:
303 (1) The school board's policies and procedures
304 regarding student retention and promotion;
305 (2) By grade level, the number and percentage of all
306 students in grades kindergarten through three with reading
307 deficiencies or substantial reading deficiencies;
308 (3) By grade level, the number and percentage of all
309 students retained in grades kindergarten to three due to
310 substantial reading deficiencies; and

SB 1628 16
311 (4) The total number and percentage of students in
312 grade three who were promoted with good cause exemptions,
313 delineated by each category of good cause exemption
314 specified in subsection 4 of this section.
✓